Florida, session 2026, HB409.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (g) of subsection (4) of section
1001.42, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1001.42 Powers and duties of district school board.—The
district school board, acting as a board, shall exercise all
powers and perform all duties listed below:
(4) ESTABLISHMENT, ORGANIZATION, AND OPERATION OF
SCHOOLS.—Adopt and provide for the execution of plans for the
establishment, organization, and operation of the schools of the
district, including, but not limited to, the following:
(g) Observance of school holidays and vacation periods.—
Designate the observance of school holidays and vacation
periods. Each school district shall observe Veterans' Day, as
listed in s. 110.117(1)(f), as a school holiday.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb409-00